Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
ARTICLE 51
ADAMS STATE UNIVERSITY

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 8 of chapter 124, C.R.S. 1963. The provisions of this article were repealed and reenacted in 2003, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this article prior to 2003, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated.

Section

23-51-101. University established - role and mission.

There is hereby established a college at Alamosa, to be known as Adams state university, which shall be a general baccalaureate institution with moderately selective admission standards. Adams state university shall offer undergraduate liberal arts and sciences, teacher preparation, and business degree programs, a limited number of graduate level programs, and two-year transfer programs with a community college role and mission. Adams state university shall receive resident credit for two-year course offerings in its commission-approved service area. Adams state university has a significant responsibility to provide access to teacher education in rural Colorado. Adams state university shall also serve as a regional education provider. In addition, Adams state university shall offer programs, when feasible, that preserve and promote the unique history and culture of the region.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article R&RE, p. 776, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

Entire section amended, (HB 12-1080), ch. 189, p. 753, § 1, effective May 19.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-51-101 as it existed prior to 2003.

23-51-102. Board of trustees - creation - members - powers - duties.

There is established the board of trustees for Adams state university, referred to in this article as the "board of trustees", which shall consist of eleven members and shall be the governing authority for Adams state university. The board of trustees shall be, and is hereby declared to be, a body corporate and, as such and by the names designated in this section, may:

Acquire and hold property for the use of Adams state university;

Be a party to all suits and contracts; and

Do all things necessary to carry out the provisions of this article in like manner as municipal corporations of this state, including but not limited to the power to demand, receive, hold, and use for the best interests of Adams state university such money, lands, or other property as may be donated or devised to or for the university.

The board of trustees and its successors shall have perpetual succession, shall have a seal, may make bylaws and regulations for the well-ordering and governance of Adams state university, and may conduct the business of the university in a manner not repugnant to the constitution and laws of this state. The board of trustees shall elect from the appointed members a chairperson, whose duties and responsibilities shall be prescribed in the duly adopted bylaws of the board of trustees. The board of trustees shall also elect a secretary and a treasurer, who are not members of the board and whose duties and responsibilities shall be prescribed in the duly adopted bylaws of the board of trustees. The staff of Adams state university shall provide staff support for the board of trustees.

The governor shall appoint, with the consent of the senate, nine members of the board of trustees. Members appointed by the governor shall serve terms of up to four years, expiring on December 31 of the third calendar year following the calendar year in which the member is appointed; except that the terms shall be staggered so that no more than three members' terms expire in the same year. Of the nine members appointed by the governor, at least two shall reside in Alamosa, Conejos, Costilla, Huerfano, Mineral, Rio Grande, or Saguache county. Of the nine members appointed by the governor, no more than five members shall be from the same political party. Each member shall hold office for the term for which the member has been appointed and until the member's successor is appointed and confirmed by the senate.

The tenth member of the board of trustees shall be a full-time junior or senior student at Adams state university, elected by the members of the student body of Adams state university. The term of the student member is one year, beginning on July 1 each year. The student member is advisory, without the right to vote and without the right to attend executive sessions of the board of trustees, as provided by section 24-6-402. The student member must have resided in the state of Colorado for not less than three years prior to the student's election.

The eleventh member shall be a member of the faculty of Adams state university elected by other members of the faculty for a term of two years, beginning on July 1 every year. The faculty member is advisory, without the right to vote and without the right to attend executive sessions of the board of trustees, as provided by section 24-6-402.

A vacancy of an appointed member of the board of trustees shall be filled by appointment by the governor for the unexpired term. A vacancy of either of the elected members of the board of trustees shall be filled by election for the unexpired term. Each member of the board of trustees shall take an oath or affirmation in accordance with section 24-12-101.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection (6), the powers, duties, and functions formerly performed by the trustees of the state colleges in Colorado with respect to Adams state university are hereby transferred to the board of trustees. Policies, resolutions, procedures, and agreements previously approved by the trustees of the state colleges and universities in Colorado and applicable to Adams state university shall remain in force and effect unless and until changed by the board of trustees.

In addition to those powers conferred elsewhere in this article, the board of trustees has the power to:

Appoint a president of Adams state university;

Appoint such other executive officers of the university as may be required;

Appoint faculty and employees as may be required;

Determine the compensation to be paid to the president, executive officers, faculty, and professional staff;

With the advice of the faculty, prescribe the degree programs for the university; and

Prescribe the student admissions qualifications.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article R&RE, p. 776, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(2) amended, p. 1231, § 4, effective May 26.

L. 2012:

(1), (3), (4), (6), and (7) amended, (HB 12-1080), ch. 189, p. 753, § 2, effective May 19.

L. 2018:

(5) amended, (HB 18-1138), ch. 88, p. 695, § 13, effective August 8.

L. 2022:

(2), (3), and (4) amended, (SB 22-013), ch. 2, p. 37, § 47, effective February 25.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 18-1138, see section 1 of chapter 88, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

23-51-102.5. Tuition - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (SB 10-003), ch. 391, p. 1844, § 13, effective June 9.

L. 2012:

(1) amended, (HB 12-1080), ch. 189, p. 755, § 3, effective May 19.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2016. (See L. 2010, p. 1844.)

23-51-103. Board of trustees for Adams state university fund - creation - control - use.

There is created in the state treasury the board of trustees for Adams state university fund, referred to in this section as the "fund", which shall be under the control of and administered by the board of trustees in accordance with the provisions of this article. Except as otherwise allowed by state law, including but not limited to section 24-36-103 (2), C.R.S., all moneys received or acquired by the board of trustees or by Adams state university shall be deposited in the fund, whether received by appropriation, grant, contract, or gift or by sale or lease of surplus real or personal property or by any other means, whose disposition is not otherwise provided for by law. All interest and income derived from the deposit and investment of moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund. The moneys in the fund are hereby continuously appropriated to the board of trustees and shall remain in the fund and shall not be transferred or revert to the general fund of the state at the end of a fiscal year.

The moneys in the fund shall remain under the control of the board of trustees and shall be used for the payment of salaries and operating expenses of the board of trustees and of Adams state university and for the payment of any other expenses incurred by the board of trustees in carrying out its powers and duties.

Moneys in the fund that are not needed for use by the board of trustees may be invested by the state treasurer in investments authorized by sections 24-36-109, 24-36-112, and 24-36-113, C.R.S. The board of trustees shall determine the amount of moneys in the fund that may be invested and shall notify the state treasurer in writing of the amount.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article R&RE, p. 778, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

(1) and (2) amended and (4) added, (HB 12-1080), ch. 189, p. 755, § 4, effective May 19.

Editor's note:

Subsection (4)(b) provided for the repeal of subsection (4), effective July 1, 2013. (See L. 2012, p. 755.)

23-51-104. Lease of grounds - construction.

For the purpose of providing dormitories, living and dining halls, or cottages and equipment for the use of the school, to enable the construction, financing, and ultimate acquisition thereof, and to aid in improving undeveloped portions of the grounds of Adams state university, the board of trustees is empowered to lease grounds under its control to private persons or corporations for a term not exceeding fifty years and subject to such regulations as it may prescribe, and upon the condition that private persons or corporations shall construct and equip on the leased grounds buildings or improvements as the board of trustees designates or approves and secure reimbursement for money invested therein from the rentals of such buildings or from their sale to the board of trustees acting for the state.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article R&RE, p. 779, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

Entire section amended, (HB 12-1080), ch. 189, p. 755, § 5, effective May 19.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-51-102 as it existed prior to 2003.

23-51-105. No authority to create state obligation.

Nothing in this article constitutes authority to enter into a contract which shall in any way create a debt or obligation upon the state on account of the construction of buildings or improvements; except that buildings and improvements erected on lands under the control of the board of trustees and devoted to the uses of Adams state university under the terms of this article and the leasehold interest shall be exempt from taxation so far as permitted by the state constitution.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article R&RE, p. 779, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

Entire section amended, (HB 12-1080), ch. 189, p. 756, § 6, effective May 19.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-51-103 as it existed prior to 2003.

23-51-106. Board of trustees to control buildings.

The management of buildings erected and equipped under the terms of this article, and the scale of rentals thereof, shall be subject to the approval of the board of trustees.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article R&RE, p. 779, § 4, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-51-104 as it existed prior to 2003.

23-51-107. Board of trustees may rent buildings.

The board of trustees is authorized to lease or rent buildings constructed under the provisions of this article from the private persons or corporations constructing the buildings upon such terms as it deems satisfactory as to current rental, maintenance, and ultimate purchase, paying therefor out of the revenues derived from the operation of the buildings by the board of trustees or from other funds under its control that are available for general maintenance purposes.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article R&RE, p. 780, § 4, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-51-105 as it existed prior to 2003.

23-51-108. State property at lease end.

Upon the termination of a lease or contract executed under the terms of this article providing for the construction and equipment of buildings, the buildings shall become the property of the state, together with all equipment, furnishings, or appurtenances therein contained or thereto attached; except that personal goods or effects of an occupant may be removed.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article R&RE, p. 780, § 4, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-51-106 as it existed prior to 2003.

23-51-109. Leasehold interest may be sold.

Nothing in this article shall prevent the transfer or sale of the leasehold interest prior to its expiration, subject to the approval of the board of trustees.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article R&RE, p. 780, § 4, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-51-107 as it existed prior to 2003.

23-51-110. Board of trustees may rent rooms.

Upon the termination of a lease or contract executed with private persons or corporations for the construction of buildings under the terms of this article, the board of trustees is empowered to rent rooms or quarters in buildings erected under the leases or contracts for reasonable compensation as it may deem best in relation to current operation, maintenance, and upkeep costs.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article R&RE, p. 780, § 4, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-51-108 as it existed prior to 2003.